troff/libhnj/hyphen.d/hyph_de_DE@traditional.dic
UTF-8
% -*- tex -*- vim: ft=tex
% This file has been derived from `dehypht.tex' as of 03 March 1999,
% to which the following applies:
% -----------------------------------------------------------------
% Copyright (C) 1988,1991 Rechenzentrum der Ruhr-Universitaet Bochum
%               [german hyphen patterns]
% Copyright (C) 1993,1994,1999 Bernd Raichle/DANTE e.V.
%               [macros, adaption for TeX 2]
%
% -----------------------------------------------------------------
% IMPORTANT NOTICE:
%
% This program can be redistributed and/or modified under the terms
% of the LaTeX Project Public License Distributed from CTAN
% archives in directory macros/latex/base/lppl.txt; either
% version 1 of the License, or any later version.
% -----------------------------------------------------------------
% A copy of the original can be obtained from <http://www.tug.org/teTeX/>.
% -----------------------------------------------------------------
% For sending bug reports, follow the instructions on
% <http://n-t-roff.github.io/heirloom/doctools.html>.
% -----------------------------------------------------------------
% Sccsid @(#)hyph_de_DE@traditional.dic	1.3 (gritter) 9/3/05
.aa6l
.a1b1l8
.a1b1r
.ab3a4s
.6a1ba
.ab3ei
.a1be
.a1bi2
.ab3it
.a1b3u
.ad3o4r
.a1d
.a1do
.alti6
.a2l1t
.a1n1e
.a6n1s
.an5a2l1g
.a3na3c
.an2g8s
.ap1p
.ar6sc
.a2r1s
.ar6ta
.a2r1t
.8ar6tei
.as2z
.au2f1
.au2s3
.be3na
.1be
.be5er1b
.ber6t5r6
.be2r1t
.bie6r5
.1bi
.b6ie
.bim6s5t
.bi2ms
.brot3
.1br
.br6u6s
.c8h6
.1che6f5
.da2r
.1da8c
.dar5in
.d2a1ri
.da1r5u
.de3s1z
.1de
.de5r6en
.de1re
.de8s2p2o
.de1sp2
.den6ka
.des6pe
.dia3s4
.1di
.dien4
.dy2s1
.ehre6n5
.eh1re
.e6hr
.ei1ne6
.ei6n5eh
.ei8nen
.ein5sa
.ei6ns
.en3k4
.en4t3r6
.en6d5r4
.e2n1d
.en6der
.en1de
.en8ta8
.en8tei
.en1te
.e1p2o1
.2er3ei
.e1re
.er3in
.2e1ri
.er3o4b
.e1r5er
.er6b5ei
.er1b
.er1be
.er6ban
.er1ba
.er6bla
.erbl8
.er6d5um
.e8rd
.er1du
.erwi5s
.er1w
.e1s1p2
.es8t
.ex1a2
.ex3em
.fal6sc
.fa2ls
.fe6st5a
.1fe
.flu4g3
.furc8h8
.1fu
.ga6ner
.1ga
.ga1ne
.ge3n4a
.1ge
.ge5rö8
.ge1s6
.ha2lb5
.hal6br
.hal1be6
.hau4t
.haup4
.he4r3e
.he5x
.hei1ma6
.her6za
.hin3
.hir8sc
.hi2r1s
.ho4c
.hu3sa
.hy5o
.i1be5
.ima6ge
.i1ma
.in1
.i1ni6
.i1s5chi
.isc8h
.ja6gd5
.ka6ph
.1ka
.kal6k5o
.ka6l1k
.ki4e
.kop6f3
.1k2o
.kraf6
.1kr8
.kü5ra
.1kü
.lab6br
.la2b1b
.liie6
.1li
.l8i1i
.lo6s5k2
.lö4s3t
.1lös
.ma5d2
.1ma
.mi2t1
.1mi
.no6th
.no6top
.no1to
.o1b1l8
.o8bs2
.ob6st5e
.ob2e8ri
.o1be
.or3c
.ort6s5e
.o2r1t
.or2ts
.o1st3a
.oste8r
.o1ste
.pe3t2s
.1pe
.pe4re6
.p8er
.1ph6
.po8str6
.1p2o
.r6au4m3
.re5an
.ro8q
.ru5the
.rü5b6e2
.rü8stet
.rü1ste
.sc8h8
.se5n6h
.1se
.se5ra
.se6e
.si2e
.1si
.spi6ke
.sp2
.1spi
.spi1k
.st4
.sy2n1
.1sy
.ta8th
.tage4s5
.1tag
.ta1ge
.tan6kl8
.te6e
.te8str6
.to6der
.to1de4
.to1d
.to6we
.to8nin
.t8o1ni
.um1
.umpf4
.u2mp
.un1
.u1ne6
.ung8e5n
.un1ge
.ur1c
.ur5en
.u1re
.ve6rin
.1ve
.ver1
.v2e1ri
.vora8
.v2or1
.wah6l5
.1wah
.we8ge1s
.1weg
.we1ge
.wo6r
.wor3a
.wu6n4s
.zi4e
.1zi
.zuc8h8
.1zu
.z2uc
.ände8re
.ä2n1d
.än1de
.öc8h8
1abdr4
a2b1d
1a2b1f8
1a2b1g2
1abhä
a2b1h
1ab1k2o
a2b1k2
1a2b1n
1a2b1w
a1d
1ad1j
1adle
a2d1l
1a2d1v
ae1r
1aero
1afri
afr6
1ag1gr4
a2g1g
1a2g8o1g
a1go
1aka1d
a1ka
1ak1k2o
a2k1k2
1al1gi
a2l1g
1anfa
an1f
1an1fä
1an5l6
1an1r
1ap1pa
1ar2z1t
1a2sth
a1th
1a2th1l
1au2f1n
1au2f1w
1au2s1b2
1au2s1f2
1au2s3g2
1au2s1w
1aus1z
1au1to
1ba
1be
1bi
bl8
1blat
1blu
1bo
1br
1bu
1by1
1bä
1bü
1c6r
1c8o
1ca
1ce
c8h
1c8hae
1che1f
1ci
1cu
1cy
1da.
1dac
1dat
1de
1di
1do
dr4
1drah
1dria
1dru
1drü
1du
1dä
1dü
1egy
1eign8
1e4k1d
e1le
1elek
1emp1f
e2mp
1emp1t
1emto
e2m1t
1en2t1z
1e2t1n
1e8x3p2
1extr6
e8x1t
fr6
1f8ran
1fe
1fi
1flor
1fo
1fr2is
1fu
1fä
1fü
1g2li1k
g1li
1g2lim
1g2ly
1ga
1ge
1g6hr
1gi
1gla1d
1glas
1gle.
1glem
1gloa
1gl2on
1glop
1glü
gn8
1gna
1gno
1go
1gr4
1gu
1gä
1gö
1gü
1haa
1he2m1m
1hoh
1holz
1in1fo
in1f
1k2o
1ka
kl8
1kla
1klä
1kr8
1ku
1kä
1kö
1kü
1la.
1la2n1d
1la1w
1le6hr
1ler
1li
1lo1k
1los.
1lun
1ly
1lös
1ma
1me
1mi
1mo
1mun
1my
1män
1mü
1n2ah
1n2ar.
1na.
1nae
1nag
1nai
1na1ma
1na1ni
1nann
1n2a1ri
1nau1e
1na1v
1n8aß
1ne
1ni
1nu
1ny1s
1näc
1nöt
o1z
1o2zea
o1ze
1ob1j
1of1fi
o2ff
o1k
1okta
o2k1t
1o6ns
1o8o1g
1opti
op1t
1oram
1or2d1n6
o8rd
1or1ga
o8r1g
1p2o
1p2sy
1pak
1pap
1pau
1pe
1ph
1pis
pr6
1pres
1prob
1pro1d
1präs
1prüf
1pu
qu6
1q6ui
1r2ig
1r4uf
1rar1h8
1re.
1re1no
1rer
1rinn
1ro6hr
1ru2ts
s1k2
1s2ki.
sp2
1s2phä
s1ph
1s2pur
s1pu
1sa.
1saa
1saf
1sag
1sai
1sal
1sam
1sa2n1d
1sas
1sat
1sche
sc8h
1schi
1scho
1schu
1se
1si
1so
1span
1s2pek
s1pe
1spi
1spra
spr6
1spru
1spü
1sta
1ste
1sti
1sto
1stu
1stä
1stö
1stü
1su
1sy
1sä
1süc
1sün
2ts
1t2sua
t1su
1ta1fe4
1tag
1ta1le
1t2a1ri
1te2il
1the.
1t8heo
1thes
1thet
1t6hr6
1thy
1ti2l1g
t2il
tr6
1trag
1trai
1trib
1träg
1tu1e
1t2uc
1tu2m1h
1tu2ms
1ty1
1tön
1tür.
1u2n2if
u1ni
1un1fä
un1f
1ve
1wah
1was
1weg
1wi1d
1wj
1xag
1xe.
1xen
1xes
1xi
1xo
1xu
1zah
1ze
1zi
1zo
1zu
zw8
1zwi
1zy
1zä
1zö
1zü
1ße
1ßi
1ßu8
1ähn5l6
1äug
1äuß
1ö2k2o
1öl.
2a1re
2a1ri
2a1ti
2ar2b1t
ar1b
2b1b
2b1c
2b1d
2b1f8
2b1g2
2b1h
2b1k2
2b1m
2b1n
2b1p2
2b1t
2b1w
2b1lun
2ch.
2chn6
2chs
2cht
c2k
2ck.
2c2ks
2d1ar1b
2d1auf
2d1aus
2d1b
2d1c
2d1d
2d1e6hr
2d1f
2d1g
2d1h
2d1i6ns
2d1k
2d1l
2d1m
2d1n6
2d1o8r1g
2d1p
2d1u2n1d
2d1v
2d1w
2d1z
2d1a2b1g2
2d1an5l6
2deal
2deol
d1j
2dju
2d1rer
2ds
2dt
2e1ri
2e1ru
2e1ni
e1re
2erei
2f1a2r1t
2f1b2
2f1d
2f1ec2k
2f1g2
2f1k2
2f1m
2f1n
2f1op
2f1p8
2f1w
2f1z
2ff
2fs
2ft
2g1ar1c
2g1a6r1m
2g1a2t1m8
2g1b
2g1f8
2g1g
2g1k
2g1m
2g1p2
2g1t
2g1w
2g1ler
2g1n2ah
2g8o1g
2g1r2ig
2grot
2gs
gu2e
2gue.
2hal.
2ha1ni
2hein
2hoi
2hö.
2höe
2i1v
2if
2i1ge
2il
2io
2ip
2k1b
2k1c
2k1eig
2k1f8
2k1g
2k1h
2k1k2
2k1m
2k1p2
2k1rec
2k1t
2k1w
2k1z
2k1an5l6
2klic
k1li
2krib
2kr2ip
2ks
2l1a8b1s
2l1a2m1t
2l1g
2l1m
2l1o8rd
2l1t
2l1u2m1f6
2l1u2m1w
2l1w
2lb
2lic2k
2ließ
2lint
2ls
2luh
2l1äug
2m1a2mp
2m1b
2m1c
2m1d
2m1f6
2m1g
2m1h
2m1i2m1m
2m1k8
2m1l
2m1m
2m1r
2m1t
2m1v
2m1w
2m1z
2mp
2ms
2n1ang
2n1ar1c
2n1a2r1t
2n1d
2n1e2mp
2n1e2rr
2n1erz
2n1i2mp
2n1i2n1d
2n1i6ns
2n1on1k
2n1o2r1t
2n1u2n1d
2n1unt
2na1x
2nec
2n1egy
2no2b1t
2nu6r
2nup
2p1haf
2p3r2ig
2pek
p8er
2pe2rr
2p2ft
2ph.
pl8
2p1ler
2p3lig
p1li
2po2rn
2pst
2p2uc
2r1ar1b
2r1a2r1t
2r1ex
2r1ir
2r1s
2r1t
2r1u2m1g
2r1u2m1l
2r1unt
2r1ur
2ra6ll
2reh
2re2m1t
2re2s1s2
2rn
2rr
2ru2ms
2s1a8b1s
2s1a6ns
2s1ar1b
2s1a2r1t
2s1a2t1l
2s1aus
2s1b2
2s1d
2s1eig
2s1e2mp
2s1f2
2s1in1f
2s1in1h
2s1i6ns
2s1m
2s1o1do
so1d
2s1o8rd
2s1pf
2s1r
2s1s2
2s1unt
2s1v
2s1w
2s1ü2b
2s3g2
2s1ca
2s6ch1f2
2sch1g
2s4ch1h
2sch1k2
2s2cht
2sch1z
2s1c8o
2siat
2skau
s1ka
2s3kow
s1k2o
2s1ku
2s1pap
2s1pis
2s5pla
spl8
2s5pol
s1p2o
2st.
2s2t1s6
2s1tag
2s2t1b2
2s2t1g2
2sth
2s2t1k2
2s2t1l
2s2t1m8
2s2t1t
2s1tu1e
2s2t1v
2s2t1w
2t1a2m1t
2t1a6r1m
2t1b2
2t1c
2t1d
2t1e6hr
2t1f2
2t1g2
th6a
2t1hau
2t1h2il
2t1hö
2t1j
2t1k2
2t1l
2t1m8
2t1n
2t1ony
2t1p2
2t1t
2t1unt
2t1v
2t1w
2t1an1r
2ta6rk
2ta2r1t
2te1he
2th.
2th1l
2th1m
2t1haa
2to1ti
2trec
2t1r2ig
2tz
2uc
2v1b
2v1f
2v1g
2v1k
2v1l
2v1m
2v1p
2v1s
2v1t
2v1v
2v1z
2w1l
2z1a1ra
2z1b
2z1ex
2z1f8
2z1k
2z1l
2z1m
2z1s8
2z1t
2z1v
2z1z
2z1ü2b
2ß1ei
3abtei
a2b1t
a2dre
3adres
adr4
3al8a6r1m
3album
a2lb
al1bu
3a8na1ly
3angab
an1ga
3angri
an1gr4
3an1n2ah
an1na
3anzug
an1zu
3apfel
ap1fe
3arbei
ar1be
3atlas
a2t1l
atl8a
3auf1fü
au2ff
3auf1ga
au2f1g2
au2f1t
3auf1tr6
3auge.
au1ge
3au2s1d
3au2s1s2
3blau.
3ble.
3blä
3blü
3ch2a1ri
e1f
3effek
e2ff
ef5fe
3eifri
e2if
eifr6
3ele1me
3entl8a
en2t1l
3erb1se
er1b
er8bs
er1kl8
3er1klä
e6rk
3ernst
e2rn
er6ns
3europ
eu1ro
3flöt
3för
3gleic
g2lie
3glie1d
i1d
3i2deal
i1de
3i2deol
3indu1s
i2n1d
in1du
3infek
in1fe
3jä
3klei1d
3kow
3lig
3lo2ch.
loc8h
3losig
lo1si
3lä2n1d
3man
3mas
3mes
3mi2t1t
3mäß
3müt
na2c
3na2cht
nac8h
3na1z
3o4pe1ra
o1pe
op8er
3ob2st.
o8bs
3paa
3par2t1n
pa2r1t
3pe2r1s
3preis
3rable
ra1bl8
re1ak
3re1a2k1t
3refl
re1f
3ro2ck.
roc2k
3rö6ll
3rü2mp
3s2tel
3s4kin.
3s4tral
str6
3s4tro1a
3s8au1e
3s8eit
3s8prec
3sa2ck.
sac2k
3sa8r1g
3scha.
3schaf
3schal
3schri
sc6hr
3sel.
3s2krib
s1kr8
3s2kr2ip
3str8aß
3s2trec
3strum
3s2uc
3t4hea
3t2hal.
3this
3to1be
3trau1e
3treib
3troc
3umfan
u2m1f6
3undzw8
u2n1d
un2d1z
3unfal
3un1glü
3urlau
ur1l
3ursac
u2r1s
3ur5tei
u2r1t
3zaun
3äq
3ärmel
ä6r1m
är1me
3ärz2t1l
är2z1t
3ä2t1k2
ü1b6e2
3ü4ber1
4a1tr6
4aner.
a1ne
4blic8h
b1li
4ch1h
4c2k1h
4d3a2r1t
4d3in1h
4d3reg
4d3uh
4drec8h
4e1lo
4e5re.
4e1mo
4ene.
e1ne
4ener.
4erer.
e1rer
4f1h
fl8e
4f3lein
4ferd.
fe8rd
4fling
f1li
4g1v
4g3ei1se
4g3ex3
4g3i6ns
4g3reic
4g3uh
4gak
4grut
4he1rap
4k1d
4k3arti
ka2r1t
4k3leit
4k3ra1d
4k3reic
kä4m
4k3ä1mi
ku1st
4ku1sti
4l3en2t1w
4l3e8r1g
4l3in1du
li2n1d
4l3in1h
4l3o4p8er
lo1pe
4l3o6hr
4l3un1te
4l3au2s1s2
4l1au1to
4lektr6
le2k1t
4l1en2t1z
4leu1ro
4lin2k1t
4lipp
l2ip
4li1sam
li1sa
4lo2r1t
4lu8r1g
4m3ar1be
mar1b
4m5auf
4ma2g1g
4n1ein
4n1int
4n1o8r1g
4n1u6hr
4n3e4lem
ne1le
4n3en3th
4n3i6gel
n2i1ge
4n3o4p8er
no1pe
4n3o8bs
4nauf
4p1d
4peic
4per1si
pht2
4ph3t1he
4plei
4r3ein1a4
4r3ei6ns
4r3enth
4r3en2t1w
4r3e8rd
4r3erla
rer1l
4r3er6ns
re2rn
4ra2l1g
4reben
re1b
re1be
4rinst
ri6ns
4ro1fe
4s1a2ff
4s1a2k1t
4s1j
4s3alpi
sa6l1p
4s3ox
4s1en2t1z
4so1pe
4s1or1ga
so8r1g
4s3pe2r1s
sp8er
4st3o1pe
4s1ta1fe4
4sta2l1g
4st3a6ns
4s1te2il
4sti2g1m
4stin1f
4s1trai
4st1r4uf
4s1t2uc
4s1tür.
4t1hä
4t1reg
4t3en2t1w
4t3er2b1t
ter1b
4t3re1z
4tab.
4ta8b1s
4t1au2f1n
4te2ff
te1f
4tein1h
4teis
4t1elek
te1le
4t1holz
4ths
4tre2if
4tüb
4v3w
4v5n
4xi1ste
4z1h
4z1p
4z3ak
4z3e2ff
ze1f
4z3i2mp
4z3oh
4ze2mp
5a4gent
a1ge
a1bl8
5a6blö
ab1re
5a6brec
a1br
a1le
5a6l5eth
5a6mei1se
a1me
a1no
5a6n1o2d
5a6n3o1ma
5a6no8rd
ab1la
5a6blag
5ab1ze
a8b1z
5ab1zu
5ad1di
a2d1d
5akro1
a1kr8
5anfe2r1t
an1fe
5ange1bo
an1ge
ange1b
5anhä
an1h
5anschl6
a6ns
an1sc
ansc8h
an1st
5anstal
an1sta
5antenn
an1te
5anwä
a8n1w
5anzeig
an1ze
5anzieh
an1zi
an1ä
5anäs
5atlant
5au4f3ent
au1fe
5blit
5blum
5blö
5cha1ra
5cha1to
5chia1d
5chias
chl6
5ch4lor
5cho.
5chth2on
5cä1
5d4eic
d1sc
5d6scha.
dsc8h
5dschi1k
d1schi
e1la
5e6la1sti
5elte2rn
e2l1t
e4ne8r1g
5ener1gi
5entwic
en2t1w
5entwu
e1pi
5epi1d
5epos
e1p2o
5erfül
er1f
er1fü
5erge2b1n
e8r1g
er1ge
erge1b
5ergänz
er1gä
5erhö1hu
er1h8
5erlös.
er1l
er1lös
5erstat
e2r1s
er1sta
5erwer1b
er1w
5essenz
e2s1s2
es1se
5f8läc
5flop
frei1
5fr4ei.
5ghel.
5glaub
5gleis
5glom
5go1gr4
5gr2if
5he2ft
he1f
5hi2tz
5horn.
ho2rn
5index
in1de
5ing2e1ni
ing8en
in1ge
5inhab
in1h
5in1j
in1sp2
5in1s2pe
i6ns
5instit
in1sti
5instru
in1str6
5inte1re
in1te
5inter1v
5jo
5klet
5kl2ip
5klop
5la1du
la1d
5laken
la1ke
5lampe.
la2mp
lam1pe
5lei1stu
5le2uc
5lip1t
5loge.
l8o1g
lo1ge
5lohn
5l6uk
5läuf
5me6ld
5mot
5mün
5n6a2r1s
5nan1c
5napf.
5na6ui
5ne1ei
5nä1e
5n6äi
5näus
5nü.
5nüß
5o4be2r1s
o1be
o1ri
5o6rient
or2ie
ori1en
5ohm.
5olym
o1ly
5orgel.
or1ge
p1t
5p6ty1
5pa1d
part8e
5p8ar5tei
pf2l
5pf8lanz
5pin1se
pi6ns
5pla
5pol
5po1ti
5prinz
5pr8o1g
5py
5ra3fal
r8afa
5ra6ld
5ran1gi
5re1ha
5ren1te
r1h8
r2hy
5rhy1t
5rout
5rö6hr
5römis
rö1mi
s1h
5s4hop
5s6au1se
5s6h2ip
5s6pom
5s6tria
s1z
5s6z4ene.
s1ze
sze1ne
5scha1de
scha1d
5schlag
schl6
5schlu
5schö
5schü
5sein.
5spal
5spring
5spän
5stra.
5s4tre2if
5stri1k
5söm
5süß
5t6si1k
t1si
5tau1se
5t8e2ch3n6
tec8h
5tep1pi
5tha.
5t4he1rap
5ther1f
5thi.
5ti1te
5to2cht
toc8h
5toll.
to6ll
5topf.
5tropf
5trub
5trup
5trüb
5täg
5tüc8h
5umlau
u2m1l
5undein
un2d1ei
un1de
5unge1a2
un1ge
5w2a1re
5wec8h
5wei1se
5wer1du
we8rd
5werk.
we6rk
5wi2r1t
5wunde.
wu2n1d
wun1de
5ya.
5zange.
zan1ge
5zwec2k
ß1a8
5ßa.
5änd2e1ru
ä2n1d
än1de
5ärge2rn
ä8r1g
är1ge
5ö6dem
ö1de
5öf2f1n
ö2ff
5öste2rr
ö1ste
5ü2bu
6a1tu
6a1ba
6ab8el
a1be
6a2t1f2
6a2t1g2
6a2t1n
6aum
6b1la1d
6b1v
6b3lein
bei1s
6b5eisen
bei1se
6blag
6ch2m
6ch3unt
6ch1b2
6chei
6cher1kl8
che6rk
6ch1f2
6chi6ns
6ch1p
6chuh
6d5a6l1k
6d5o1be
6d5ony
6d5r1h8
6d5unt
6da2b1t
6d1a2b1w
6da6ns
6dan1zu
6de2ff
de1f
6din1f
6dje
6do8rd
6do1th
6d1re.
6dur1l
6dursa
du2r1s
6däh
6e1nat
6e1ro.
6e3roi
6elan
6ele1f
6enem.
6enen
6enes
6eren.
6f1c
6f1j
6f1v
6f3l2on
6f5otte
fo2t1t
6f5u2ms
6f1an5l6
6fap
6f1r2ig
6fun1f
6f1äug
6g1hei
6g1hi
6g1rec
6g3arti
ga2r1t
6g5a2m1t
6g5auf
6g5en2t1f2
6g5erz.
6g5oh
6g5unt
6g1a2b1w
6g1an5l6
6gar1b
6gd
6gla2s1s2
6gn.
6gonist
g8o1ni
gon6is
6groh
6gue1d
6gä6r1m
6güb
6h1e2mp
6ha1le
6hanz
6har1b
6ho8r1g
6hr
6jm
6k1v
6k3ar1be
kar1b
6k5ein
6k5eis
6k5l6er.
k1ler
6k5ox
6k1en2t1z
6kin1h
kn8
6kner
k1ne
6k1r2ig
6kro1ba
6l1h
